tests/gna_cond.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../sah.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../sah.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "буол": 
    буол<v><iv><gna_cond><p3><sg> : буоллар
    буол<v><iv><neg><gna_cond><p3><sg> : буолбатар
    буол<v><iv><gna_cond><p1><sg> : буолларбын
    буол<v><iv><neg><gna_cond><p1><sg> : буолбатарбын

  "бар":
    бар<v><iv><gna_cond><p3><sg> : бардар
    бар<v><iv><neg><gna_cond><p3><sg> : барбатар
    бар<v><iv><gna_cond><p1><sg> : бардарбын
    бар<v><iv><neg><gna_cond><p1><sg> : барбатарбын
